New York, session 2025-2026, S4777.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 240.30 of the penal law is renum- 2 bered subdivision 6 and a new subdivision 5 is added to read as follows: 3 5. With the intent to harass, annoy, threaten or alarm another person 4 whom the actor knows or reasonably should know to be a first responder, 5 including but not limited to correction officers, such actor causes or 6 attempts to cause such first responder to come into contact with saliva 7 by spitting, throwing, tossing or expelling such fluid; or 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09554-01-5